Ohio, session 136, HB692.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 3701.83, 3718.02, 3718.021, 3718.03, 3718.06, 3718.11, 6111.44, and 6111.441 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 3701.83. There is hereby created in the state treasury the general operations fund. Moneys in the fund shall be used for the purposes specified in sections 3701.04, 3701.344, 3711.16, 3717.45, 3718.02, 3718.06, 3721.02, 3721.022, 3729.07, 3733.43, 3748.04, 3748.05, 3748.07, 3748.12, 3748.13, 3749.04, 3749.07, 3776.08, and 4769.09 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3718.02. (A) The Subject to division (C) of this section, the director of health, in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, shall adopt, and subsequently may amend and rescind, rules of general application throughout the state to administer this chapter. Rules adopted under division (A) of this section shall do at least all of the following: (1) Require that the appropriate board of health approve or disapprove the installation, operation, and alteration of a sewage treatment system if it is not connected to a sanitary sewerage system; (2)(2)(a) Require a board of health, or other person as established by rule, to conduct a site evaluation for any proposed installation of a sewage treatment system;, which shall include a soil evaluation for any sewage treatment system used as the primary system on a property. (b) Except as provided in division (A)(2)(c) of this section, the rules shall not require a soil evaluation for a replacement area or a newly created lot. If a soil evaluation is not conducted, a board of health may provide a notification statement to the applicable property owner, in accordance with division (D) of this section, stating a soil evaluation was not conducted during the review of the newly created lot. (c) The rules may authorize a board of health to conduct a soil evaluation on a newly created lot when limitations exist at the location that may prevent a sewage treatment system from being installed on the lot. (d) The rules shall require a developer or property owner of a newly created lot to provide a written notice to any prospective purchaser of that lot stating that a soil evaluation was not conducted and that soil conditions may limit or prevent the installation of a sewage treatment system on that lot if either of the following apply: (i) The local board of health determined that a soil evaluation was not required for that lot. (ii) The local board of health was not notified when the lot was split or created. (e) The rules shall authorize a board of health to require a soil evaluation if a household sewage treatment system is proposed to be installed in a disturbed area that lacks any in-situ soil in order to determine if a household sewage treatment system can be installed in the area. (f) The rules shall require the director of health to provide annual soil evaluation training for local health departments. Such training may be conducted electronically. (3) Prescribe standards for the siting, design, installation, operation, monitoring, maintenance, and abandonment of sewage treatment systems that may be used in this state and for the progressive or incremental alteration or repair of an existing sewage treatment system or the progressive or incremental installation of a new system to replace an existing sewage treatment system. The rules shall be adopted so as to establish a preference for the repair of an existing sewage treatment system, when technically and economically feasible, rather than its replacement with a new system. The standards shall include at a minimum all of the following: (a) Soil absorption specifications and vertical separation distances. (i) Soil absorption specifications established in rules shall include standards regarding the sizing of sewage treatment systems in use in the state. (ii) In establishing soil absorption specifications and vertical separation distances, the rules shall identify those soil conditions that present a low or moderate risk of inadequate treatment or dispersal of sewage from sewage treatment systems. For low and moderate risk conditions, the required vertical separation distance shall not exceed eighteen inches except as authorized pursuant to rules adopted under divisions (A)(3)(a)(iii) and (iv) of this section. In addition, the rules shall identify those soil conditions that present a high risk of inadequate treatment or dispersal of sewage. For such high risk conditions, the vertical separation distance shall be set at a depth from twenty-four to thirty-six inches and shall not be lowered unless a reduction of vertical separation is granted in accordance with rules adopted under division (A)(3)(a)(iii) of this section. (iii) The rules shall establish options to be utilized by a board of health when approving the reductions of or compliance with vertical separation distances that are established in rules adopted under division (A)(3)(a)(ii) of this section. The options for a board of health in providing such approval shall include, but not be limited to: the use where deemed appropriate for a particular site of subsurface interceptor drains, perimeter drains, or engineered drainage; pretreatment of sewage; or soil elevation. (iv) The rules shall provide that a board of health may petition the director to increase the vertical separation distances required for sewage treatment systems in the applicable health district or a portion of the district when conditions present a high risk of inadequate treatment or dispersal of sewage. The rules also shall provide that the director may approve such a request upon a demonstration by the board of health that unusual or unique local conditions relating to terrain, bedrock, water table, soil fragments, or soil textures require the establishment of greater vertical separation distances within the jurisdiction of the board of health or a portion thereof. If, under the rules, the director of health approves a greater vertical separation distance, a board of health still may approve a reduction of that vertical separation distance for an individual sewage treatment system pursuant to rules adopted under division (A)(3)(a)(iii) of this section. Further, if, under the rules, the director approves a greater vertical separation distance, a person who is denied permission by a board of health to install or replace a sewage treatment system as a result of the director's approval may request a hearing in accordance with section 3718.11 of the Revised Code. (b) Specifications for the quality of treated sewage effluent from household sewage treatment systems that is applied to soil on the property where a household sewage treatment system is located. The specifications established in the rules for the quality of effluent from discharging systems shall comply with discharge requirements imposed by the national pollutant discharge elimination system permit program established under section 6111.03 of the Revised Code and rules adopted under it. (c) Requirements for the reasonable maintenance of a system according to maintenance requirements approved by the director of health as recommended by the sewage treatment system technical advisory committee or according to accepted standards and practices established in rules, as applicable. The requirements may include standards for service contracts or other arrangements that assure regular maintenance and upkeep of the system. In determining the reasonableness of a maintenance requirement, the director shall consider a manufacturer's maintenance requirements as well as all other maintenance alternatives. (4) Prescribe procedures for notification to boards of health of the approval of a sewage treatment system or components of a system by the director of health under section 3718.04 of the Revised Code; (5) Prescribe criteria and procedures under which boards of health shall issue installation permits, operation permits, and alteration permits for sewage treatment systems. The rules shall require as a condition of an installation permit that the installer of a system must warrant that the system was installed in accordance with all applicable rules and design requirements. In addition, the rules shall require a board of health, not later than sixty days after the issuance of an installation, operation, or alteration permit, to notify the director that the permit was issued. The rules shall require the notification to be in a format prescribed by the director and to include information related to the issuance of the permit. With the assistance of the department of health, a board of health, to the extent practicable, shall computerize the process of the issuance of permits for sewage treatment systems. (6) Require a board of health to inspect conduct an educational assessment of a sewage treatment system not later than twelve months after its installation to ensure that the system is operating properly. The rules shall require a board of health, not later than sixty days after the inspection, to certify to the director on a form provided by the director that the inspection was performedassessment may be scheduled with the owner of the sewage treatment system. (7) Require Authorize each board of health to develop a program for the administration of maintenance requirements established in rules adopted under division (A)(3)(c) of this section. The rules shall include requirements and procedures under which a person property owner may demonstrate the required maintenance of a system in lieu of having an inspection conducted when an inspection otherwise is required. The rules shall require a board of health to provide written notice to a person property owner that is demonstrating maintenance of a system in lieu of an inspection that if proof of the required maintenance of the system is not provided as required by rules, the system is subject to inspection by the board and the reasonable cost of the inspection must be paid by the person property owner. The rules shall authorize a board of health to inspect any sewage treatment system if there is a good-faith complaint regarding the system, there is probable cause for the inspection, or proof of the required maintenance of the system has not been provided as required by rules. A property owner providing proof of the required maintenance of the system does not preclude the board of health from conducting compliance inspections for the purpose of oversight of such maintenance or from requiring the payment of an operation permit fee. In addition, the rules shall authorize a board of health to inspect a sewage treatment system without prior notice in any instance in which the board has probable cause to believe that the system is endangering or threatening to endanger public health. The rules shall require that the reasonable costs for sewage effluent testing or evaluation be paid by the owner of a sewage treatment system that is being investigated. Further, the rules shall establish a methodology for determining the reasonable costs of an inspection in accordance with section 3709.09 of the Revised Code. The rules shall allow, but shall not require, a board of health to continue an inspection program that was established by the board prior to the effective date of the rules, provided that the program authorizes a person to demonstrate the required maintenance of a system in lieu of an inspection. (8) Require a board of health the department of health to register do all of the following: (a) Register installers, service providers, and septage haulers that perform work within the health districtstate; prescribe criteria and procedures for the registration; and prescribe criteria for a demonstration of competency as a part of the (b) Require each installer, service provider, and septage hauler to submit an application for registration before the first day of January of each year, unless such application is for initial registration; (c) Establish a timeline for when an applicant for initial registration is registered for the subsequent registration period. The The rules shall establish uniform statewide bonding requirements or other financial security requirements for installers, service providers, and septage haulers as a condition of registration within any health district. The rules shall establish a methodology by which the required amount of a bond or other security may be calculated for each installer, service provider, and septage hauler. The methodology, at a minimum, shall consider the number of systems installed or serviced and the type of system installed or serviced by an installer, service provider, or septage hauler on an annual basis. The rules shall provide that no board of health shall require an additional or different bond or security requirement as a condition of registration beyond the bonding and security requirements established in the rules adopted under division (A)(8) of this section. The rules shall establish a cost methodology for determining the fee for the annual registration and a prorated fee for the initial registration of an installer, service provider, or septage hauler in any health districtthe state and allow for the collection and deposit of the fees in the general operations fund created under section 3701.83 of the Revised Code. The director of health shall ensure that not less than seventy-five per cent of the proceeds from those fees are used for the benefit and support of the boards of health. The proceeds distributed to the boards of health shall be distributed in accordance with the same subsidy formula adopted by the director under section 3701.342 of the Revised Code. (9) Prescribe requirements for the collection, transportation, disposal, and land application of domestic septage in this state from a sewage treatment system; (10) Require boards of health to maintain records that are determined necessary to ascertain compliance with this chapter and the rules adopted under it; (11) Require the manufacturer of a sewage treatment system that is authorized for use in this state in rules adopted under this section or that is approved for use in this state under section 3718.04 of the Revised Code to provide instructions for the operation and maintenance of the system. The rules shall provide that a board of health may require a copy of a manufacturer's instructions for the operation and maintenance of a system to be filed with the board prior to the installation and use of the system in the health district in which the board has jurisdiction. In addition, the rules shall require a board of health and a manufacturer to provide a copy of the operation and maintenance instructions, if available, when a board of health or a manufacturer receives a written request for instructions. (12)(11) Prescribe criteria for the provision of written evidence of compliance with rules pertaining to sewage treatment for purposes of sections 711.05 and 711.10 of the Revised Code; (13)(12) Pursuant to divisions (A)(1) and (3) of this section, prescribe standards for the siting, design, installation, operation, monitoring, maintenance, and abandonment of small flow on-site sewage treatment systems that may be used in this state; (14)(13) Prescribe minimum criteria and procedures under which boards of health may establish household sewage treatment district management programs for the purpose of providing a responsive approach toward preventing or solving sewage treatment problems resulting from household sewage treatment systems within the districts established under the program. For purposes of division (A)(14)(A)(13) of this section, a board of health may enter into a contract with any entity to administer a household sewage treatment district management program. (15)(14) Prescribe standards for the use of subsurface interceptor drains, perimeter drains, and engineered drainage to remove or divert any subsurface water from an area to be used for soil absorption of sewage in the soil of a sewage treatment system; (16)(15) Prescribe standards for the inspection of septage hauling truck tanks by boards of health, including, but not limited to, tank seal safety specifications; (17)(16) Establish standards and testing methods to ensure that all septic tanks, other disposal component tanks, dosing tanks, pump vaults, household sewage treatment disposal system holding tanks and privy vaults, or other applicable sewage disposal system components manufactured after September 17, 2010, and used in this state are watertight and structurally sound; (18)(17) Require a board of health to give notice and an opportunity for a hearing, pursuant to section 3718.11 of the Revised Code, to an affected property owner regarding any of the following: (a) The denial of an installation, operation, or alteration permit for a sewage treatment system; (b) The imposition of a condition on the installation of a sewage treatment system; (c) The required replacement of a sewage treatment system; (d) Any other final order or decision of a board of health that is made under this chapter concerning which a property owner is claiming to be aggrieved or adversely affected. The rules also shall establish procedures for giving such notice and for conducting the hearing required in rules adopted under division (A)(18)(A)(17) of this section. (19)(18) Prescribe standards for the regulation of gray water recycling systems; (20)(19) Prohibit a sewage treatment system from causing a public health nuisance; (21)(20) Define economic impact for purposes of division (B) of this section and section 3718.022 of the Revised Code. The director may adopt other rules under division (A) of this section that the director determines are necessary to implement this chapter and to protect the public health and welfare. At least sixty days prior to adopting a rule under division (A) of this section, the director shall provide boards of health and any other interested parties an opportunity to comment on the rule. (B)(1) In accordance with section 3709.20 or 3709.21 of the Revised Code, as applicable, and subject to review by and approval of the director under division (C) of section 3718.05 of the Revised Code, a board of health may adopt rules necessary for the public health providing for more stringent standards than those established in rules adopted by the director under division (A) of this section. In proposing or adopting the rules, a board of health shall consider and document the economic impact of the rules on property owners within the applicable health district. (2) A board that intends to adopt rules shall notify the department of health of the proposed rules and submit a copy of the proposed rules and the documentation of the economic impact of the rules at least ninety days prior to the proposed date of adoption. The director shall approve or disapprove any such proposed rule within ninety days after receiving a copy of the proposed rule from the board of health. (3) In reviewing a proposed rule, the director shall approve the rule if all of the following apply: (a) The proposed rule is not in conflict with this chapter or rules adopted under it. (b) The proposed rule is authorized by division (B) of this section. (c) The proposed rule is no less stringent than rules adopted by the director. (d) Unless otherwise authorized by this chapter or rules adopted under it, the proposed rule does not require design changes to a sewage treatment system, or component thereof, that differ from a design authorized in rules adopted under division (A) of this section, including rules adopted under division (A)(1) or (A)(3)(a)(iii) or (iv) of this section, or approved by the director under section 3718.04 of the Revised Code. (e) The proposed rule does not require operation or maintenance procedures for a sewage treatment system that conflict with operation or maintenance procedures authorized in rules adopted under division (A) of this section, including rules adopted under division (A)(1) or (A)(3)(a)(iii) or (iv) of this section, or approved by the director under section 3718.04 of the Revised Code. (4) If a board of health fails to submit a proposed rule to the director or fails to demonstrate that the board has considered the economic impact of the proposed rule, the rule shall have no force or effect and is not enforceable. (C)(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law or rules to the contrary, no board of health shall prohibit the installation of a sewage treatment system on a slope so long as the sewage treatment system meets the design criteria prescribed in the rules and the installation does not pose a risk to contractor safety. (2)(a) Except as provided in divisions (C)(2)(b) and (c) of this section, a board of health shall not require a permit if a sewage treatment system is repaired and the repair entails replacing components of the system with the same component or a component similar to the original component. (b) A board of health shall require a permit for the replacement of a septic tank or aeration treatment unit tank. However, the board of health shall not require the existing system to be upgraded, provided that the replacement tank is one of the same type and design capacity as the original system and is approved for use under applicable state standards. (c) A board of health shall require a permit if the soil absorption component of a sewage treatment system is being altered or replaced. (D) If a soil evaluation is not conducted in accordance with division (A)(2)(b) of this section, a board of health may provide a notification statement to the applicable property owner stating a soil evaluation was not conducted during the review of the newly created lots. The board of health, in consultation with the association of Ohio health commissioners and the Ohio environmental health association, may create the notification statement and determine when issuance of the statement is appropriate. Sec. 3718.021. (A) A board of health may regulate the siting, design, installation, operation, monitoring, maintenance, and abandonment of small flow on-site sewage treatment systems in accordance with rules adopted by the director of health under division (A)(13)(A)(12) of section 3718.02 of the Revised Code. If a board of health chooses to regulate small flow on-site sewage treatment systems, the board first shall send written notification to the director of health and the director of environmental protection. (B) If a board of health chooses to regulate small flow on-site sewage treatment systems under division (A) of this section and later determines that it no longer wants to regulate those systems, the board shall notify the director of health and the director of environmental protection. Upon the receipt of the notification by the director of environmental protection, the board of health shall cease regulating small flow on-site sewage treatment systems, and the environmental protection agency shall regulate those systems. (C) If after a survey conducted under section 3718.07 of the Revised Code the director of health finds that a board of health that has chosen to regulate small flow on-site sewage treatment systems is not complying with the rules adopted under division (A)(13)(A)(12) of section 3718.02 of the Revised Code, the director shall notify the director of environmental protection and the board of health. Upon receipt of the notification, the board shall cease regulating small flow on-site sewage treatment systems, and the environmental protection agency shall regulate those systems. Sec. 3718.03. (A) There is hereby created the sewage treatment system technical advisory committee consisting of the director of health or the director's designee and thirteen members who are knowledgeable about sewage treatment systems and technologies. The director or the director's designee shall serve as committee secretary and may vote on actions taken by the committee. Of the thirteen members, five shall be appointed by the governor, four shall be appointed by the president of the senate, and four shall be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. (1) Of the members appointed by the governor, one shall represent academia and shall be active in teaching or research in the area of on-site wastewater treatment, one shall be a representative of the public who is not employed by the state or any of its political subdivisions and who does not have a pecuniary interest in sewage treatment systems, one shall be a registered professional engineer employed by the environmental protection agency, one shall be selected from among soil scientists in the division of soil and water conservation in the department of agriculture, and one shall be a representative of a statewide organization representing townships. (2) Of the members appointed by the president of the senate, one shall be a health commissioner who is a member of and recommended by the association of Ohio health commissioners, one shall represent the interests of manufacturers of sewage treatment systems, one shall represent installers and service providers, and one shall be a person with demonstrated experience in the design of sewage treatment systems. (3) Of the members appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, one shall be a health commissioner who is a member of and recommended by the association of Ohio health commissioners, one shall represent the interests of manufacturers of sewage treatment systems, one shall be an environmental health specialist who is registered under Chapter 3776. of the Revised Code and who is a member of the Ohio environmental health association, and one shall be a registered professional engineer with experience in sewage treatment systems. (B) Terms of members appointed to the committee shall be for three years, with each term ending on the same day of the same month as did the term that it succeeds. Each member shall serve from the date of appointment until the end of the term for which the member was appointed. Members may be reappointed. Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as provided for original appointments. Any member appointed to fill a vacancy occurring prior to the expiration date of the term for which the member was appointed shall hold office for the remainder of that term. A member shall continue to serve after the expiration date of the member's term until the member's successor is appointed or until a period of sixty days has elapsed, whichever occurs first. The applicable appointing authority may remove a member from the committee for failure to attend two consecutive meetings without showing good cause for the absences. (C) The technical advisory committee annually shall select from among its members a chairperson and a vice-chairperson. The secretary shall keep a record of its proceedings. A majority vote of the members of the full committee is necessary to take action on any matter. The committee may adopt bylaws governing its operation, including bylaws that establish the frequency of meetings. (D) Serving as a member of the sewage treatment system technical advisory committee does not constitute holding a public office or position of employment under the laws of this state and does not constitute grounds for removal of public officers or employees from their offices or positions of employment. Members of the committee shall serve without compensation for attending committee meetings. (E) A member of the committee shall not have a conflict of interest with the position. For the purposes of this division, "conflict of interest" means the taking of any action that violates any provision of Chapter 102. or 2921. of the Revised Code. (F) The sewage treatment system technical advisory committee shall do all of the following: (1) Develop with the department of health standards, guidelines, and protocols for approving or disapproving a sewage treatment system or components of a system under section 3718.04 of the Revised Code. Any guideline requiring the submission of scientific information or testing data shall specify, in writing, the protocol and format to be used in submitting the information or data. (2) Develop with the department an application form to be submitted to the director by an applicant for approval or disapproval of a sewage treatment system or components of a system and specify the information that must be included with an application form; (3) Make recommendations to the director regarding the approval or disapproval of an application sent to the director under section 3718.04 of the Revised Code requesting approval of a sewage treatment system or components of a system; (4) Pursue and recruit in an active manner the research, development, introduction, and timely approval of innovative and cost-effective sewage treatment systems and components of a system for use in this state, which shall include conducting pilot projects to assess the effectiveness of a system or components of a system. (G) The chairperson of the committee shall prepare and submit an annual report concerning the activities of the committee to the general assembly not later than ninety days after the end of the calendar year. The report shall discuss the number of applications submitted under section 3718.04 of the Revised Code for the approval of a new sewage treatment system or a component of a system, the number of such systems and components that were approved, any information that the committee considers beneficial to the general assembly, and any other information that the chairperson determines is beneficial to the general assembly. If other members of the committee determine that certain information should be included in the report, they shall submit the information to the chairperson not later than thirty days after the end of the calendar year. (H) The department shall provide meeting space for the committee. The committee shall be assisted in its duties by the staff of the department. (I) Sections 101.82 to 101.87 of the Revised Code do not apply to the sewage treatment system technical advisory committee. Sec. 3718.06. (A) A (A)(1) Except as prohibited under division (A)(2) of this section, a board of health shall establish fees in accordance with section 3709.09 of the Revised Code for the purpose of carrying out its duties under this chapter and rules adopted under it, including fees for installation permits, operation permits, and alteration permits issued by the board. All fees so established and collected by the board shall be deposited in a special fund of the district to be used exclusively by the board in carrying out those duties. (2) A board of health shall not charge a fee under division (A)(1) of this section unless the board conducts a service for the purposes of this chapter and the rules adopted under it. (B) In accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, the director of health may establish by rule a fee to be collected from applicants for installation permits and alteration permits issued under rules adopted under this chapter. The director of health shall use not more than ninety per cent of the proceeds from that fee for administering and enforcing this chapter and the rules adopted under it by the director. The director shall use not less than ten per cent of the proceeds from that fee to establish a program in cooperation with boards of health to fund installation and evaluation of sewage treatment system new technology pilot projects through grants or other agreements. In the selection of pilot projects, the director shall consult with the sewage treatment system technical advisory committee. A board of health shall collect and transmit the fee to the director pursuant to section 3709.092 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3718.11. (A) A property owner may request a hearing with the board of health for any reason described in division (A)(18)(A)(17) of section 3718.02 of the Revised Code. A property owner may appeal the results of the hearing to either of the following: (1) The court of common pleas of the county in which the property owner's land is located; (2) A sewage treatment system appeals board that is established in accordance with this section. (B) A property owner that wishes to appeal to a sewage treatment system appeals board shall file the appeal with the board of health within whose jurisdiction the property owner's land is located. Upon receipt of a filing, the board of health shall send the filing of the appeal to the chairperson of the sewage treatment system appeals board for the county in which the board of health has jurisdiction. (C)(1) Not later than ninety days after the effective date of this section September 17, 2010, a sewage treatment system appeals board shall be appointed for each county as follows: (a) One member shall be appointed by the health commissioner of the general health district having jurisdiction in the county. (b) One member shall be appointed by the judge of the probate court of the county having the longest continuous service as a judge of the probate court. (c) One member shall be appointed by the director of health. (2) Terms of appointment to a sewage treatment system appeals board shall be for two years. Members may be reappointed. Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as provided for original appointments. Any member appointed to fill a vacancy occurring prior to the expiration of the term for which the member was appointed shall hold office for the remainder of that term. (3) The person appointed by the judge of the probate court shall serve as chairperson of the board. A majority vote of the members of the board is necessary to take action on any matter. The chairperson of the board shall designate the time and location for a hearing before the board. Members of the board shall serve without compensation. (4) A board of health shall send an appeal that has been filed with the board of health under division (B) of this section to the sewage treatment system appeals board immediately after the appeal has been filed. Not later than forty-five days after a hearing before a sewage treatment system appeals board, the board shall issue a written decision concerning an appeal before the board. (5) The judge of the probate court who made an appointment to the board under this section shall establish due process procedures to be used by the applicable sewage treatment system appeals board appointed under this section for the purpose of hearing appeals regarding orders and decisions of a board of health. All appeals before the applicable sewage treatment system appeals board shall be conducted in accordance with those procedures. The procedures may include filing fees applicable to appeals conducted by the sewage treatment system appeals board. (D) An appeal before a sewage treatment system appeals board is final, and no further appeal may be taken. Sec. 6111.44. (A) Except as otherwise provided in division (B) of this section, in section 6111.14 of the Revised Code, or in rules adopted under division (G) of section 6111.03 of the Revised Code, no municipal corporation, county, public institution, corporation, or officer or employee thereof or other person shall provide or install sewerage or treatment works for sewage, sludge, or sludge materials disposal or treatment or make a change in any sewerage or treatment works until the plans therefor have been submitted to and approved by the director of environmental protection. Sections 6111.44 to 6111.46 of the Revised Code apply to sewerage and treatment works of a municipal corporation or part thereof, an unincorporated community, a county sewer district, or other land outside of a municipal corporation or any publicly or privately owned building or group of buildings or place, used for the assemblage, entertainment, recreation, education, correction, hospitalization, housing, or employment of persons. In granting an approval, the director may stipulate modifications, conditions, and rules that the public health and prevention of pollution may require. Any action taken by the director shall be a matter of public record and shall be entered in the director's journal. Each period of thirty days that a violation of this section continues, after a conviction for the violation, constitutes a separate offense. (B) Sections 6111.45 and 6111.46 of the Revised Code and division (A) of this section do not apply to any of the following: (1) Sewerage or treatment works for sewage installed or to be installed for the use of a private residence or dwelling; (2) Sewerage systems, treatment works, or disposal systems for storm water from an animal feeding facility or manure, as "animal feeding facility" and "manure" are defined in section 903.01 of the Revised Code; (3) Residual farm products and manure treatment or disposal works and related management and conservation practices that are subject to rules adopted under division (E)(1) of section 939.02 of the Revised Code. As used in division (B)(3) of this section, "residual farm products" and "manure" have the same meanings as in section 939.01 of the Revised Code. (4) Sewerage or treatment works for the on-lot disposal or treatment of sewage from a small flow on-site sewage treatment system, as defined in section 3718.01 of the Revised Code, if the board of health of a city or general health district has notified the director of health and the director of environmental protection under section 3718.021 of the Revised Code that the board has chosen to regulate the system, provided that the board remains in compliance with the rules adopted under division (A)(13)(A)(12) of section 3718.02 of the Revised Code. The exclusions established in divisions (B)(2) and (3) of this section do not apply to the construction or installation of disposal systems, as defined in section 6111.01 of the Revised Code, that are located at an animal feeding facility and that store, treat, or discharge wastewaters that do not include storm water or manure or that discharge to a publicly owned treatment works. Sec. 6111.441. In addition to the exemption established under division (B)(4) of section 6111.44 of the Revised Code, sewerage or treatment works for the on-lot disposal or treatment of sewage from a small flow on-site sewage treatment system, as defined in section 3718.01 of the Revised Code, concerning which the board of health of a city or general health district has notified the director of health and the director of environmental protection under section 3718.021 of the Revised Code that the board has chosen to regulate the system are exempt from the administrative and permitting requirements established in this chapter and rules adopted under it and the fees established under section 3745.11 of the Revised Code, provided that the board remains in compliance with the rules adopted under division (A)(13)(A)(12) of section 3718.02 of the Revised Code. Section 2. That existing sections 3701.83, 3718.02, 3718.021, 3718.03, 3718.06, 3718.11, 6111.44, and 6111.441 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed.